Maryland, session 2026, SB0202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–113.1.
(A) AT ANY TIME BEFORE A HEARING IS HELD BY THE HEARING BOARD
UNDER § 3–106 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A POLICE OFFICER WHO IS DENIED A RIGHT
GRANTED BY THIS SUBTITLE MAY APPLY TO THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR AN ORDER
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0202*

SENATE BILL 202
THAT DIRECTS THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO SHOW CAUSE WHY THE RIGHT
SHOULD NOT BE GRANTED.
(B) THE POLICE OFFICER SHALL MAKE THE APPLICATION:
(1) IF THE POLICE OFFICER IS AN EMPLOYEE OF A COUNTYWIDE OR
LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, TO THE CIRCUIT COURT OF THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IS LOCATED; AND
(2) IF THE POLICE OFFICER IS AN EMPLOYEE OF A STATEWIDE OR
BICOUNTY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, TO THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY.
3–110.
(a) A police officer may not be discharged, disciplined, demoted, or denied
promotion, transfer, or reassignment, or otherwise discriminated against or threatened in
regard to the police officer’s employment because the police officer:
(1) disclosed information that evidences:
(i) mismanagement;
(ii) a waste of government resources;
(iii) a danger to public health or safety; or
(iv) a violation of law or policy committed by another police officer; or
(2) lawfully exercised constitutional rights.
(b) A police officer may not be denied the right to bring suit arising out of the
police officer’s official duties.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a police officer has the same
rights to engage in political activity as a State employee.
(2) This right to engage in political activity does not apply when the police
officer is on duty or acting in an official capacity.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a law enforcement agency
may not prohibit secondary employment by police officers.
(2) A law enforcement agency may adopt reasonable regulations that relate
to secondary employment by police officers.

SENATE BILL 202 3
(E) A POLICE OFFICER WHO IS DENIED A RIGHT GRANTED BY THIS SECTION,
FOR WHICH THE DENIAL IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO BE REMEDIED BY A TRIAL BOARD
UNDER § 3–106 OF THIS SUBTITLE, MAY APPLY TO THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR AN
ORDER THAT DIRECTS A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO SHOW CAUSE WHY THE
RIGHT SHOULD NOT BE GRANTED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.